Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 7 HOUSING AND BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND FINANCING
29-4-710. Powers of the board - executive director - housing facility loans - assistance in housing facility development.

Upon acceptance of a housing facility plan pursuant to section 29-4-709 and upon or prior to the issuance of bonds or other financial arrangement for the development of such facility, the board shall have adopted rules and regulations applicable to such plan. In addition to the other powers granted in this part 7, the authority shall have the power to, and, upon the adoption of a plan as provided in section 29-4-709, the board shall authorize the executive director to:

Make, purchase, or participate in making or purchasing housing facility loans or commitments therefor to sponsors, which are approved pursuant to section 29-4-716 and are subject to the limitations prescribed by section 29-4-717, and to low- or moderate-income families and, in connection with any such loan:

To agree to limitations upon the right to dispose of any housing facility or part thereof or to undertake additional housing facility programs;

To a governmental entity, to agree to limitations upon the exercise of any powers conferred upon the authority by this part 7.

Except as provided in this section, housing facility loans to sponsors or to low- or moderate-income families shall be secured by a mortgage or such other security interest as the authority shall determine adequate to secure repayment of the housing facility loan.

Make or participate in the making of housing facility loans secured by second deeds of trust or mortgages to sponsors or low- or moderate-income families if the total amount of such second deeds of trust or mortgages does not exceed fifteen percent of the total amount of loans secured by first deeds of trust or mortgages issued by the authority;

Collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing, and servicing of loans;

Sell at public or private sale, including the sale to the federal national mortgage association or the government national mortgage association, all or any part of any mortgage or other instrument or document securing a construction, land development, mortgage, or temporary loan of any type permitted by this part 7;

Purchase, in order to meet the requirements of the sale of its mortgages to the federal national mortgage association, stock of the association;

Consent to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other terms of any mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, construction loan, temporary loan, contract, or agreement of any kind to which the authority is a party;

Include in any loan such amounts necessary to pay financing charges, consultant, advisory, and legal fees, and such other expenses, including interest charges, as are necessary or incidental to such loan;

Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in accordance with the provisions of this part 7, including contracts with any person, firm, corporation, governmental agency, or other entity;

Receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any appropriation or any gift, grant, or donation of any property or money;

Assist in the preparation and operation of housing facility programs and planning for the construction of any such housing facility or any part thereof;

Set construction standards for housing facilities financed under this part 7;

Insure or require the insuring of the property or operations of the housing facilities against such risks as the board deems advisable;

Procure insurance of any secured debts or parts thereof made or held by the board on any property included in any housing facility.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 809, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-10.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 973, § 6, effective April 9.

L. 77:

IP(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1418, § 5, effective May 14.

L. 79:

(1)(n) added, p. 1618, § 18, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(1)(n) repealed, p. 473, § 9, effective April 15.

L. 2007:

IP(1), (1)(a)(II), and (1)(b) amended, p. 706, § 6, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-709 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-710.5. Powers of the board - lease, sale, or financing of projects.

Except as otherwise provided in an intergovernmental agreement entered into pursuant to article 46.5 of title 24, C.R.S., the authority may not undertake or finance a project until the board or the executive director pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board first determines that:

Providing the project will assist in promoting sound economic development or in maintaining employment in the area in which the project is or is to be located, or in an area reasonably accessible thereto, or in the reduction of unemployment or underemployment in such area;

The financing agreement relating thereto provides for payment to the authority of such revenues that, together with any government subsidies relating to the project and other moneys available or expected to be available, will be sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all notes and bonds issued to finance the project, to build up and maintain any reserves deemed advisable by the authority in connection therewith, and to pay the costs of maintaining the project in good repair and keeping it properly insured, unless the financing agreement obligates the sponsor to pay for the maintenance of and insurance on the project; and

The sponsor of the project is not a state agency, county, municipality, or other public body except the authority and the land on which the project is to be located has not been acquired by exercise of the power of eminent domain during the two years preceding the submission of the project plan to the authority.

Upon making the determinations specified in subsection (1) of this section and in case of projects involving the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of a building, upon approval by the board of a project plan, the authority, in addition to the other powers granted by this part 7, shall have the following powers:

To commit to enter and to enter into a financing agreement to sell, make, or participate in a loan to finance or lease for a term not exceeding ninety-nine years, with or without an option to purchase, any project, without public bidding or public sale, and upon such terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate. The authority may enter into such a financing agreement prior to, at the date of, or subsequent to the completion of the project. Where such a financing agreement is entered into, the authority may pay the project costs of the project and complete the construction and development of the project prior to any actual conveyance, loan, or lease.

To commit to enter and to enter into a financing agreement to purchase or participate in the purchase, from a lender, of loans to sponsors to finance project costs, upon such terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate. The authority may enter into such a financing agreement prior to, at the date of, or subsequent to the completion of the project.

To commit to enter and to enter into a financing agreement to make a loan to a lender, upon the condition that the lender invest the proceeds of such loan in loans to sponsors to finance project costs on such terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate;

To acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, improve, alter, equip, and repair or to provide for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, alteration, equipping, and repairing of any project; to maintain, operate, and manage or to provide for the maintenance, operation, and management of any project; to mortgage or otherwise encumber any project; and to sell or lease any project;

To prepare or cause to be prepared plans, specifications, designs, and estimates of costs for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, alteration, equipment, maintenance, or repairing of any project and to periodically modify such plans, specifications, designs, and estimates.

All projects shall be subject to any applicable master plan, official map, zoning regulations, building code, and other regulations governing land use or planning of the county or municipality in which the project is or is to be located. However, nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to prohibit or otherwise affect the right of the authority, a sponsor, or any other person to apply for and obtain, by any lawful means and to the extent otherwise permitted by law, an amendment to, a change in, or a variance from any such master plan, official map, zoning regulation, building code, or other regulation governing land use or planning with respect to any project.

Each county and municipality in which a project is located, in connection with such project, shall provide police, fire, sanitation, health protection, and other governmental services of the same character and to the same extent as those provided for other residents of such county and municipality.

The authority shall be empowered to enter into contractual agreements with any county or municipality with respect to the furnishing of any additional community, municipal, or public facilities or services necessary or desirable for any project.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the state, any state agency, any county, and any municipality in which a project is or is to be located, and any board, authority, agency, department, commission, public corporation, or instrumentality of such county or municipality, shall have the power to lend or grant money or any other form of property, real, personal, or mixed, to the authority and to enter into contracts to make such loans and grants, all upon such terms and conditions as the authority and the state, state agency, county, or municipality, as the case may be, may agree upon.

Except as otherwise provided in an intergovernmental agreement entered into pursuant to article 46.5 of title 24, C.R.S., the authority shall exercise its powers in connection with the financing of projects primarily for the benefit of small businesses, and the authority shall prepare as part of its annual report a summary of the nature and extent of its assistance rendered to small business projects.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 466, § 8, effective April 23.

L. 87:

IP(1), (1)(c), and IP(2) amended, p. 1193, § 10, effective May 20.

L. 91, 1st Ex. Sess.:

IP(1) and (7) amended, p. 13, § 2, effective July 5.

Cross references:

For county planning and building codes, see article 28 of title 30; for municipal zoning restrictions, see part 3 of article 23 of title 31.

29-4-710.6. Powers of the board - loans for capital.

The authority may not assist the capital needs of any profit or nonprofit enterprise or undertaking until the board or the executive director pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board first determines that:

Repealed.

The amount of a loan to provide capital to an enterprise does not exceed the amount by which the total capital needs of such enterprise during a specified period exceeds the sum of the revenues of the operation reasonably expected to be available to the enterprise during such period to meet capital needs and the amount of any reserves for anticipated operating deficits and available to the enterprise during such period; and

The financing agreement relating thereto provides for the payment to the authority of such revenues as will be, together with any government subsidies relating to the enterprise and other moneys available or expected to be available, sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all notes and bonds issued to finance the loan and to build up and maintain any reserves deemed advisable by the authority in connection therewith.

Upon making the determinations specified in subsection (1) of this section, the authority, in addition to the other powers granted by this part 7, shall have the following powers:

To commit to enter and to enter into a financing agreement to purchase or participate in the purchase from a lender of loans to provide capital to business enterprises upon such terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate;

To commit to enter and to enter into a financing agreement to make a loan to a lender upon the condition that the lender invest the proceeds of such loan in loans to provide capital to business enterprises upon such terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate;

In connection with the preservation of its rights with respect to any loan, to provide capital to a business enterprise, to provide for the acquisition, operation, management, or maintenance of a business enterprise, and to sell or otherwise dispose of any business enterprise.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 468, § 8, effective April 23.

L. 87:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (2)(a) to (2)(c) amended and (1)(a) repealed, pp. 1194, 1197, §§ 11, 21, effective May 20.

29-4-710.7. Powers of the board - issuance of bonds to maintain balances in the unemployment compensation fund.

Upon receiving the certifications specified in subsection (2) of this section, the authority, in addition to the other powers granted by this part 7, has the following powers:

To issue from time to time its bonds and notes as provided in this part 7 to provide sufficient funds to maintain adequate balances in the unemployment compensation fund; to repay amounts advanced to the state pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1321; to pay the principal of, and interest and premium, if any, on, the bonds and notes, the costs of bond issuance and administration, and any other related fees and costs of the authority or the division of unemployment insurance; to establish reserves for and make deposits into the unemployment compensation fund and otherwise apply the proceeds of the bonds and notes for any of the purposes set forth in this paragraph (a);

To levy certain bond assessments as follows:

All bonds and notes issued pursuant to this section are limited obligations of the authority, payable solely from revenues generated through the levy by the authority of a bond assessment against each employer, as defined in section 8-70-113, C.R.S., subject to experience rating under articles 70 to 82 of title 8, C.R.S., in an aggregate amount sufficient to satisfy subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) or from revenues generated through the levy by the division of unemployment insurance of a bond assessment under section 8-71-103 (2)(d), C.R.S., from payments from the division of unemployment insurance to the authority or moneys applied by the division under section 8-77-101 (1), C.R.S., from proceeds derived from the sale of bonds and notes issued under this section and from the earnings on those proceeds, and all money and securities in all special accounts created by and under the control of the authority under this section. The division of unemployment insurance shall collect and administer the bond assessment in substantially the same manner as other employer premiums and surcharges required under articles 70 to 82 of title 8, C.R.S. Subject to articles 70 to 82 of title 8, C.R.S., the assessment does not apply to the covered employers of state and local government, to those nonprofit organizations that are reimbursable employers, or to political subdivisions electing the special rate.

The division of unemployment insurance may deposit all or any portion of moneys collected from assessments for principal-related bond repayment costs into the unemployment compensation fund. The portion of these revenues deposited into the unemployment compensation fund constitutes part of each employer's unemployment insurance contributions, and the division of unemployment insurance shall pay amounts from these revenues to the authority for the repayment of the principal of bonds issued under this section or section 8-71-103 (2)(d), C.R.S.

The levy must be at a rate or rates that, when applied against the taxable wages of those employers subject to the bond assessment, will produce an amount sufficient to pay all costs associated with or otherwise relating to bonds and notes issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, including the principal of, and interest and premium, if any, on, the bonds and notes, the costs of bond issuance and administration, other related fees and costs of the authority or the division of unemployment insurance, and reserves therefor.

Employers shall submit bond assessments described in this paragraph (b) associated with nonprincipal-related bond repayment costs in the same manner as the employer's normal premiums and surcharges paid under articles 70 to 82 of title 8, C.R.S., and the assessments are a lien upon the real and personal property of an employer in the manner and to the extent set forth in section 8-79-103, C.R.S. The division of unemployment insurance shall deposit these assessments into the unemployment bond repayment account created in section 8-77-103.5, C.R.S., and shall, after offsetting the division's costs for collecting and administering the bond assessments, use these funds only for payment from time to time to one or more special accounts created by and under the control of the issuer of the bonds. The issuer of the bonds shall use all moneys accruing in a special account only to pay nonprincipal-related bond repayment costs described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), and the issuer of the bonds shall pay any moneys remaining in such an account and not be required to pay nonprincipal-related bond repayment costs to the division of unemployment insurance for deposit in the unemployment compensation fund.

Employers shall submit bond assessments described in this paragraph (b) associated with principal-related bond repayment costs in the same manner as the employer's normal premiums and surcharges paid under articles 70 to 82 of title 8, C.R.S., and the assessments are a lien upon the real and personal property of an employer in the manner and to the extent set forth in section 8-79-103, C.R.S. The division of unemployment insurance may deposit all or any portion of the assessments into the unemployment compensation fund. The portion of the assessments deposited into the unemployment compensation fund constitute part of each employer's unemployment insurance contributions. Bond assessments described in this paragraph (b) associated with principal-related bond repayment costs are available for payment from time to time to one or more special accounts created by and under the control of the issuer of the bonds. All moneys accruing in a special account for principal-related bond repayment costs can be used by the issuer of the bonds only to pay the principal costs of the bonds.

The authority shall not issue its bonds and notes pursuant to subsection (1) of this section until the monthly balance in the unemployment compensation fund is equal to or less than nine-tenths of one percent of the total wages reported by ratable employers for the calendar year, or the most recent available four consecutive quarters prior to the last computation date and the governor, the state treasurer, and the executive director of the department of labor and employment have each certified in writing to the authority:

That other funding alternatives to the issuance of bonds and notes by the authority pursuant to subsection (1) of this section have been considered and that the issuance of such bonds and notes is the most cost-effective means for the division of unemployment insurance to maintain adequate balances in the unemployment compensation fund or to repay moneys advanced to the state pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1321;

The amount of money required to maintain adequate balances in the unemployment compensation fund or to repay moneys advanced to the state pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1321, or both;

The amount of bonds and notes required for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section; and

The bond assessment rate or rates, or a formula or other procedure for determining such rate or rates, that will produce an amount sufficient, together with any other moneys available or expected to be available, to pay all costs associated with or otherwise relating to bonds and notes issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, including the principal of, and interest and premium, if any, on, the bonds and notes, the costs of bond issuance and administration, and any other related fees and costs of the authority or the division of unemployment insurance, and reserves therefor.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 715, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 312, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 2009:

(1)(b)(I) and (1)(b)(III) amended, (HB 09-1363), ch. 363, p. 1910, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(II), (1)(b)(III), IP(2), (2)(a), and (2)(d) amended, (HB 12-1120), ch. 27, p. 110, § 29, effective June 1.

L. 2012, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1)(b)(I) and (1)(b)(III) amended and (1)(b)(IV) added, (HB 12S-1002), ch. 2, p. 2430, § 15, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments to this section by House Bill 12-1120 (chapter 27, Session Laws of Colorado 2012) was changed from August 8, 2012, to June 1, 2012, by House Bill 12S-1002 (First Extraordinary Session, chapter 2, p. 2430, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsections (1)(b)(I) and (1)(b)(III) and adding subsection (1)(b)(IV), see section 1 of chapter 2, First Extraordinary Session, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

29-4-711. Power of board - housing facility plans - mortgage purchase - loans to lenders.

Upon a finding by the board that investment in, or purchase or participation in the purchase of, mortgage loans or interests therein or that making loans to lenders is necessary to provide housing facilities within the means of low- or moderate-income families, it may cause the executive director to formulate and from time to time modify a plan for the development of housing facilities by the authority investing in, purchasing, or participating in the purchase of mortgage loans or interests therein from lenders or making loans to lenders. If the board ascertains that the necessary means of financing such a plan are available to the authority, the board may signify its approval of such a plan.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 975, § 7, effective April 9.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-710.4 in House Bill 75-1026 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-712. Powers of the board - executive director - mortgage purchase - loans to lenders - assistance in providing housing facilities.

Upon the approval by the board of a plan pursuant to section 29-4-711 and upon or prior to the authorization of bonds or other financial arrangement to implement the plan, the board shall authorize the executive director to:

Invest in, purchase, participate in the purchase, make commitments for the purchase or participation in the purchase, and take assignments from lenders of mortgage loans;

Make loans and commitments therefor to lenders.

No mortgage loan or interest therein purchased from a lender shall be eligible for purchase or commitment to purchase by the authority under this section unless, at or before the time of transfer thereof to the authority, such lender certifies that in its judgment the mortgage loan would in all respects be a prudent investment at the purchase price paid.

The authority shall require, as a condition of a loan to a lender, that the lender invest the proceeds of such loan in mortgage loans to families or sponsors upon such terms and conditions as the authority may require.

(3.5) The authority shall require, as a condition of purchase or commitment to purchase mortgage loans or interests therein, the following:

That such mortgage loans shall have been made upon such terms and conditions as the authority may require; or

That the proceeds of such purchase, or their equivalent, shall be invested in mortgage loans upon such terms and conditions as the authority may require.

Mortgage loans made by lenders to families with the proceeds of a loan as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, pursuant to a commitment to purchase as provided for in paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) of this section, or with the proceeds of the purchase of a mortgage loan as provided for in paragraph (b) of subsection (3.5) of this section, shall be to families who qualify as low-income or low- or moderate-income families.

Mortgage loans made by lenders to sponsors with the proceeds of a loan under subsection (3) of this section shall be made on such terms and conditions as the board may determine periodically.

In conjunction with the purchase of such mortgage loans or interests therein from lenders, the authority may require the lender to furnish collateral security in such amounts as the authority shall determine to be necessary to assure the payment of such mortgage loans and the interest thereon as the same become due. Such collateral security shall consist of any obligations or mortgages satisfactory to the authority.

Each loan to a lender shall be a general obligation of the lender and shall be additionally secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of and lien upon collateral security in such amounts and of such types as the board, by regulation, determines to be necessary to assure the payment of such loans and the interest thereon as the same become due and payable.

The authority may require in the case of any or all lenders that any required collateral be lodged with a bank or trust company, located either within or outside the state, designated by the authority as custodian therefor. In the absence of such requirement, each lender shall enter into an agreement with the authority referring to this subsection (6); containing such provisions as the authority deems necessary to identify, maintain, and service such collateral; and providing that the lender shall hold such collateral as trustee for the benefit of the authority and shall be held accountable as the trustee of an express trust for the application and disposition of such collateral, including the income and proceeds therefrom, solely for the uses and purposes as provided in the agreement. A copy of each such agreement and any revisions or supplements thereto, which revisions or supplements may, among other things, add to, delete from, or substitute items of collateral pledged by such agreement, shall be filed with the secretary of state to perfect the security interest of the authority in the collateral. No filing, recording, possession, or other action under article 9 of title 4, C.R.S., or any other law of this state shall be required to perfect the security interest of the authority in such collateral. The security interest of the authority in such collateral shall be deemed perfected, and the trust for the benefit of the authority so created shall be binding on and after the time of such filing with the secretary of state against all parties having prior unperfected or subsequent security interests or claims of any kind in tort, in contract, or otherwise against such lender. The authority may also establish such additional requirements as it deems necessary with respect to the pledging, assigning, setting aside, or holding of such collateral and the making of substitutions therefor or additions thereto and the disposition of income and receipts therefrom.

Subject to any agreement with holders of bonds, the authority may collect, enforce the collection of, and foreclose on any collateral required by subsections (5) and (6) of this section and acquire or take possession of such collateral and sell the same at public or private sale, with or without public bidding, and otherwise deal with such collateral as may be necessary to protect the interest of the authority therein.

In addition to the other powers granted by this part 7, the authority shall have the power, with respect to mortgage purchases and loans to lenders as provided under this section and section 29-4-711, to collect and pay reasonable fees and charges, to exercise the powers enumerated in section 29-4-710 (1)(c) to (1)(m), and to establish the terms and conditions of such mortgage purchases and loans to lenders by rules and regulations, including, without limitation, rules and regulations as to:

Reinvestment and commitments to reinvest by lenders of the proceeds of mortgage purchases or loans;

Requirements as to the location, number of units, and other characteristics of the housing facilities to be financed through such reinvestment by lenders;

The type, term, interest rate, purchase price, and condition of mortgages to be acquired by the authority and of mortgage loans to be made by lenders;

The warranties, representations, and services of lenders;

Restrictions as to the interest rates on housing facility loans or the return realized therefrom in order to protect against the realization by lenders of excessive financial returns or benefits as determined by prevailing market conditions;

Such other matters related to such mortgage purchases and loans to lenders as shall be deemed necessary by the authority to accomplish the purposes of this part 7.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 975, § 7, effective April 9.

L. 77:

(3) and (6)(b) R&RE and (3.5) added, pp. 1418, 1419, §§ 6, 7, effective May 14.

L. 79:

(9) repealed, p. 1129, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 82:

(3) amended and (4) R&RE, p. 472, §§ 4, 5, effective April 15.

L. 2007:

(4)(a) amended, p. 706, § 7, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-710.5 in House Bill 75-1026 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-713. Power of the board - home improvement loans.

The board may cause the executive director to formulate and from time to time modify a plan for the provision of home improvement loans upon a finding by the board that the provision of such loans is necessary for any one or more of the following purposes:

To bring housing facilities for low- or moderate-income families into compliance with state, county, or municipal building, housing maintenance, fire, health, or similar codes and standards applicable to housing, including standards adopted by the authority under section 29-4-714;

To reduce the total energy requirements of such housing facilities;

To improve such housing facilities to a more livable and maintainable condition as part of a program or plan to arrest deterioration by means of neighborhood conservation and upgrading.

If the board ascertains that private financing for home improvement loans is not available on reasonably equivalent terms and conditions and that the necessary means of financing such plan are available to the authority, the board may approve such plan.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 689, § 3, effective April 19.

L. 77:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(c) added and (2) amended, p. 1413, § 3, effective June 19.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-710.6 in House Bill 76-1231 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-714. Powers of the board - home improvement loans - purchase of such loans - loans to lenders.

Upon the approval by the board of a plan pursuant to section 29-4-713 and upon or prior to the authorization of bonds or other financial arrangement to implement the plan, the board shall authorize the executive director to:

Make home improvement loans and commitments therefor to sponsors;

Invest in, purchase, participate in the purchase of, make commitments for the purchase or participation in the purchase of, and take assignments from lenders of home improvement loans;

Make loans and commitments therefor to lenders for the purpose of making funds available for home improvement loans.

Home improvement loans may be insured or uninsured and may be made with such security, or may be unsecured, as the board deems advisable.

Notwithstanding anything in the provisions of sections 29-4-711 and 29-4-712, the authority shall require, as a condition of a loan to a lender under this section, that the lender invest the proceeds of such loan in home improvement loans or in short-term obligations pending the making of such home improvement loans.

Loans to lenders under this section shall be subject to the provisions of section 29-4-712 (6) and (7).

Home improvement loans made or acquired by the authority under this section or made by a lender with the proceeds of a loan under this section shall be to families who qualify as low-income or low- or moderate-income families.

In addition to the other powers granted by this part 7, the authority shall have the power, with respect to home improvement loans, the purchase of such loans, and loans to lenders under this section and section 29-4-713, to collect and pay reasonable fees and charges, to exercise the powers enumerated in section 29-4-710 (1)(c) to (1)(m), and to establish the terms and conditions of such loans, loan purchases, and loans to lenders by rules and regulations, including but not limited to rules and regulations as to:

The alterations, repairs, and improvements which may be financed with home improvement loans;

The term, interest rate, and principal amount of home improvement loans made by the authority or by lenders and the purchase price of such loans purchased by the authority;

Requirements as to the type, age, location, condition, and other characteristics of housing facilities as to which home improvement loans may be made;

Requirements as to the application and use by lenders of the proceeds of home improvement loan purchases or loans to lenders;

The warranties, representations, compensation, and services of lenders;

Such other matters related to home improvement loans, to the purchase thereof, or to loans to lenders under this section as shall be deemed necessary by the authority.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 689, § 3, effective April 19.

L. 77:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (2), (3), (5), IP(6), (6)(a), (6)(b), (6)(c), (6)(d), and (6)(f) amended, p. 1413, § 4, effective June 19.

L. 82:

(5) R&RE, p. 472, § 6, effective April 15.

L. 2007:

(5) amended, p. 707, § 8, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-710.7 in House Bill 76-1231 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-715. Sponsor - limitations on distributions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

p. 811, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-11.

L. 75:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (2) amended, p. 977, § 8, effective April 9.

L. 82:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, p. 468, § 9, effective April 23.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 707, § 9, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-711 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-716. Standards for approval of organizations.

No sponsor shall be considered eligible to develop housing facilities or provide services in connection therewith pursuant to this part 7 unless it shows to the authority's satisfaction that the organization is incorporated, authorized to do business, or otherwise organized as required by the laws of this state.

The sponsor, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, shall submit full details of its organizational documents, articles, and bylaws to the authority and shall provide and pay for an independent annual audit as may be required by the authority.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 811, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-12.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 977, § 9, effective April 9.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-712 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-717. Findings - percentage of low-income families required.

Prior to the authority's making or committing to make a housing facility loan for a housing facility with more than five dwelling units under this part 7, the board shall find:

That low-income families can afford, on the basis of the use of not more than thirty percent of annual income as determined in accordance with rules and regulations of the authority, the adjusted rentals set for no less than twenty percent of the dwelling units in such proposed housing facility;

That the number of units intended for occupancy by low- and moderate-income families shall approximate seventy-five percent of the total number of units available;

That such housing facility will not create or contribute to an undue concentration of low-income families in any one neighborhood.

Prior to the authority's making or committing to make any housing facility loan, the authority shall find:

That, with respect to the housing facility, no restrictions are imposed as to sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, race, creed, color, religion, ancestry, or national origin of occupants;

That such housing facility is designed to house families of varied economic means and will not create or contribute to an undue concentration of low-income families in any one neighborhood.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 812, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-13.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 978, § 10, effective April 9.

L. 82:

(1)(a) amended, p. 473, § 7, April 15.

L. 2007:

(1)(c) and (2) amended, p. 708, § 10, effective May 3.

L. 2008:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1603, § 33, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 897, § 44, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-713 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (2)(a), see section 1 of chapter 341, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.